Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2506
Powers.

A domiciliary foreign personal representative who has complied with section 30-2505 may exercise as to assets in this state all powers of a local personal representative and may maintain actions and proceedings in this state subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties generally.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 212, UPC § 4-205.